Washington statutes.
RCW 36.93.190

Decision of board not to affect existing franchises, permits, codes, ordinances, etc., for ten years.

For a period of ten years from the date of the final decision, no proceeding, approval, action, or decision on a proposal or an alternative shall be deemed to cancel any franchise or permit theretofore granted by the authorities governing the territory to be annexed, nor shall it be deemed to supersede the application as to any territory to be annexed, of such construction codes and ordinances (including but not limited to fire, electrical, and plumbing codes and ordinances) as shall have been adopted by the authorities governing the territory to be annexed and in force at the time of the decision.

[ 1967 c 189 s 19.]